Nebraska, session 109, LB115.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB115 LB115
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-3105, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3105 (1) The certification administrator of the volunteer
department shall file with the Department of Revenue a certified list of
those volunteer members who have qualified as active emergency
responders, active rescue squad members, or active volunteer firefighters
for the immediately preceding calendar year of service no later than
February 15. The certification administrator shall also send a copy of
such certified list to the governing body of the county, city, village,
or rural or suburban fire protection district. Such copy may be sent
electronically or by mail.
(2) Each volunteer member on the list described in subsection (1) of
this section shall receive a refundable credit against the income tax
imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 in an amount equal to one
thousand two hundred fifty dollars for any beginning with the second
taxable year in which such volunteer member is included on such list. The
volunteer member shall claim the credit by including a copy of the
certification received under subsection (3) of section 77-3104 with the
volunteer member's state income tax return.
Sec. 2. Original section 77-3105, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-